Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8714
Patient safety organization; conditions.

A patient safety organization shall meet the following conditions:

(1) It shall be a Nebraska nonprofit corporation described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01, contributions to which are deductible under section 170 of the code;

(2) The purposes of the organization shall include carrying out the activities of a patient safety organization as described in the Patient Safety Improvement Act; and

(3) It shall have a representative board of directors as described in section 71-8715.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 14.